Hawaii statutes.
§576E-4 Service. (a) In any
proceeding to establish a child support order, in cases where the agency is not
yet enforcing an order of support for the subject child, service of the notice
provided in section 576E-5 shall be by personal service or certified mail,
return receipt requested. In the case where the person to be served cannot be
found, service shall be completed by leaving copies of the notice at the
person’s usual place of residence with some person of suitable age and
discretion residing at that location. After initial service is effected,
additional service upon a party shall be satisfied by regular mail to the
party’s last known address.

(b) Service of the notice of hearing pursuant
to the request for hearing under section 576E-6 of a party shall be satisfied
by regular mail to the party's address provided with the request for hearing,
or if not provided, to the party's last known address.

(c) In any child support enforcement
proceeding subsequent to an order already being enforced by the agency, upon a
showing that diligent effort has been made to ascertain the location of a
party, notice and service of process shall be presumed to be satisfied upon
delivery of written notice to the most recent residential or employer address
on file with the state case registry pursuant to section 571-52.6. [L 1988, c
154, pt of §2; am L 1990, c 176, §11; am L 1994, c 105, §5; am L 1997, c 293,
§34; am L 2001, c 95, §§5, 6; am L 2002, c 84, §7]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next